Utah statutes.
32B-8-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Boundary of a resort building" means the physical boundary of the land reasonably related to a resort building and any structure or improvement to that land as determined by the commission.

(2)  "Dwelling" means a portion of a resort building:

(a)  owned by one or more individuals;

(b)  that is used or designated for use as a residence by one or more persons; and

(c)  that may be rented, loaned, leased, or hired out for a period of no longer than 30 consecutive days by a person who uses it for a residence.

(3)  "Engaged in the management of the resort" may be defined by the commission by rule.

(4)  "Invitee" means an individual who in accordance with Subsection 32B-8-304(12) is authorized to use a resort spa by a host who is:

(a)  a resident; or

(b)  a public customer.

(5)  "Provisions applicable to a sublicense" means:

(a)  for a full-service restaurant sublicense, Chapter 6, Part 2, Full-service Restaurant License;

(b)  for a limited-service restaurant sublicense, Chapter 6, Part 3, Limited-service Restaurant License;

(c)  for a club sublicense, Chapter 6, Part 4, Club License;

(d)  for an on-premise banquet sublicense, Chapter 6, Part 6, On-premise Banquet License;

(e)  for an on-premise beer retailer sublicense, Chapter 6, Part 7, On-premise Beer Retailer License; and

(f)  for a resort spa sublicense, Part 3, Resort Spa Sublicense.

(6)  "Public customer" means an individual who holds a customer card in accordance with Subsection 32B-8-304(13).

(7)  "Resident" means an individual who:

(a)  owns a dwelling located within a resort building; or

(b)  rents lodging accommodations for 30 consecutive days or less from:

(i)  an owner of a dwelling described in Subsection (7)(a); or

(ii)  the resort licensee.

(8)  "Resort" means a location:

(a)  on which is located one resort building; and

(b)  that is affiliated with a ski area that physically touches the boundary of the resort building.

(9)  "Resort building" means a building:

(a)  that is primarily operated to provide dwellings or lodging accommodations;

(b)  that has at least 150 units that consist of a dwelling or lodging accommodations;

(c)  that consists of at least 400,000 square feet:

(i)  including only the building itself; and

(ii)  not including areas such as above ground surface parking; and

(d)  of which at least 50% of the units described in Subsection (9)(b) consist of dwellings owned by a person other than the resort licensee.

(10)  "Resort spa" means a spa, as defined by rule by the commission, that is within the boundary of a resort building.

(11)  "Sublicense" means:

(a)  a full-service restaurant sublicense;

(b)  a limited-service restaurant sublicense;

(c)  a club sublicense;

(d)  an on-premise banquet sublicense;

(e)  an on-premise beer retailer sublicense; and

(f)  a resort spa sublicense.

(12)  "Sublicense premises" means a building, enclosure, or room used pursuant to a sublicense in connection with the storage, sale, furnishing, or consumption of an alcoholic product, unless otherwise defined in this title or in the rules made by the commission.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

